Maine, session 132, LD11.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§23 is enacted to read:
23. Temperature standards for school buildings. A school board shall adopt and
implement a written policy establishing standards for minimum temperatures and
maximum temperatures for school buildings. The policy must be posted on the school
board's school administrative unit's publicly accessible website. A school board shall seek
guidance from the department prior to adopting and implementing the written policy.
Page 1 - 132LR0055(03)